Utah statutes.
26-21-209.   Direct Access database -- Contents -- Use.

(1)  The department shall create and maintain a Direct Access Clearance System database, which:

(a)  includes the names of individuals for whom the department has received an application for clearance; and

(b)  indicates for each applicant whether an application is pending and whether clearance has been granted and retained.

(2) (a)  The department shall allow covered providers and covered contractors to access the database electronically.

(b)  Data accessible to a covered provider or covered contractor is limited to the information under Subsection (1) for:

(i)  covered individuals engaged by the covered provider or covered contractor; and

(ii)  individuals:

(A)  whom the covered provider or covered contractor could engage as covered individuals; and

(B)  who have provided the covered provider or covered contractor with sufficient personal identification information to uniquely identify the individual in the database.

(c) (i)  The department may establish fees, in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, for use of the database by a covered contractor.

(ii)  The fees may include, in addition to any fees established by the department under Subsection 26-21-204(9), an initial set-up fee, an ongoing access fee, and a per-use fee.

